New York, session 2025-2026, A3389.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (b) and paragraph (d) of 2 subdivision 2 of section 2895-b of the public health law, as added by 3 chapter 156 of the laws of 2021, are amended and a new subparagraph (iv) 4 is added to paragraph (b) to read as follows: 5 (iii) the existence of [an acute] a labor supply shortage within a 6 particular region. When determining if there is [an acute] a labor 7 supply shortage within a specific region in a specific quarter, or a 8 shorter period of time as determined by the commissioner, the commis- 9 sioner shall take into consideration the following factors: overall 10 regional labor supply, regional labor supply of available certified 11 nurse aides, licensed practical nurses and registered nurses; regional 12 pay rates for [the relevant titles] certified nurse aides, licensed 13 practical nurses and registered nurses employed in a nursing home within 14 the particular county or any adjoining county relative to the facility 15 as determined by the federal department of labor, bureau of labor 16 statistics; and evidence that the facility attempted to procure suffi- 17 cient staffing. 18 (iv) The department shall not impose any penalties due to the exist- 19 ence of a labor supply shortage during the period of and for one year 20 following any declared statewide disaster emergency pursuant to section 21 twenty-eight of the executive law relating to healthcare staff short- 22 ages. 23 (d) In determining whether a nursing home has violated its obligations 24 under this section, it shall not be a defense that such nursing home was 25 unable to secure sufficient staff if the lack of staffing [was foreseea- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03748-01-5 A. 3389 2 1 ble and could be prudently planned for, or] involved routine staffing 2 needs that arose due to typical staffing patterns, typical levels of 3 absenteeism, or time off typically approved by the employer for vaca- 4 tion, holidays, sick leave, and personal leave. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.